Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1131.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1422.4. Prohibited Substances in Competitive Foods.--(a) A public school may not sell or offer a competitive food on school grounds during the school day if the competitive food contains any of the following substances:(1) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).(2) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).(3) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).123456789101112131415161718 (4) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).(5) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).(6) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"CAS" means the unique accession number assigned by the Chemical Abstracts Service, a division of the American Chemical Society, as of the effective date of this section, to a substance."Competitive food" means a food offered or sold in competition with reimbursable meals served under the National School Lunch or School Breakfast Program . "School day" has the same meaning as provided in section 1326.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2027.20250HB1131PN1416 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516